Missouri, session 2026, HB2519.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Sections 43.506, 557.035, 590.040, 590.050, and 650.910, RSMo, are
repealed and eight new sections enacted in lieu thereof, to be known as sections 43.506,
557.035, 590.040, 590.050, 650.910, 650.2000, 650.2005, and 660.840, to read as follows:
43.506. 1. Those offenses considered reportable for the purposes of sections 43.500
to 43.651 include all felonies; class A misdemeanors; all violations for driving under the
influence of drugs or alcohol; any offense that can be enhanced to a class A misdemeanor or
higher for subsequent violations; any offense classified as a hate offense under section
557.055, and comparable ordinance violations consistent with the reporting standards
established by the National Crime Information Center, Federal Bureau of Investigation, for
the Federal Interstate Identification Index System; and all cases arising under chapter 566.
The following types of offenses shall not be considered reportable for the purposes of sections
57.403, 43.500 to 43.651, and 595.200 to 595.218: nonspecific charges of suspicion or
investigation, general traffic violations and all misdemeanor violations of the state wildlife
code. All offenses considered reportable shall be reviewed annually and noted in the
Missouri charge code manual established in section 43.512. All information collected
pursuant to sections 43.500 to 43.651 shall be available only as set forth in section 610.120.
2. Law enforcement agencies, court clerks, prosecutors and custody agencies may
report required information by electronic medium either directly to the central repository or
indirectly to the central repository via other criminal justice agency computer systems in the
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 2519 2
state with the approval of the highway patrol, based upon standards established by the
advisory committee.
3. In addition to the repository of fingerprint records for individual offenders and
applicants, the central repository of criminal history and identification records for the state
shall maintain a repository of latent prints, palm prints and other unique biometric
identification submitted to the repository.
557.035. 1. For all violations of section 565.054 or 565.090, subdivision (1) of
subsection 1 of section 569.100, or subdivision (1), (2), (3), (4), (6), (7) or (8) of subsection 1
of section 571.030, which the state believes to be knowingly motivated because of race, color,
religion, national origin, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity,or disability of the victim or
victims, the state may charge the offense or offenses under this section, and the violation is a
class D felony.
2. For all violations of section 565.056; subdivision (1) of subsection 1 of section
569.090; subdivision (1) of subsection 1 of section 569.120; section 569.140; or section
574.050; which the state believes to be knowingly motivated because of race, color, religion,
national origin, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, or disability of the victim or victims,
the state may charge the offense or offenses under this section, and the violation is a class E
felony.
3. The court shall assess punishment in all of the cases in which the state pleads and
proves any of the motivating factors listed in this section.
4. Nothing in this section shall be interpreted as impairing the freedom of speech
or criminalizing protected speech.
590.040. 1. The POST commission shall set the minimum number of hours of basic
training for licensure as a peace officer no lower than six hundred, with the following
exceptions:
(1) Up to one thousand hours may be mandated for any class of license required for
commission by a state law enforcement agency;
(2) As few as one hundred twenty hours may be mandated for any class of license
restricted to commission as a reserve peace officer with police powers limited to the
commissioning political subdivision;
(3) Persons validly licensed on August 28, 2001, may retain licensure without
additional basic training;
(4) Persons licensed and commissioned within a county of the third classification
before July 1, 2002, may retain licensure with one hundred twenty hours of basic training if
the commissioning political subdivision has adopted an order or ordinance to that effect;
(5) Persons serving as a reserve officer on August 27, 2001, within a county of the
first classification or a county with a charter form of government and with more than one

HB 2519 3
million inhabitants on August 27, 2001, having previously completed a minimum of one
hundred sixty hours of training, shall be granted a license necessary to function as a reserve
peace officer only within such county. For the purposes of this subdivision, the term "reserve
officer" shall mean any person who serves in a less than full-time law enforcement capacity,
with or without pay and who, without certification, has no power of arrest and who, without
certification, must be under the direct and immediate accompaniment of a certified peace
officer of the same agency at all times while on duty; and
(6) The POST commission shall provide for the recognition of basic training received
at law enforcement training centers of other states, the military, the federal government and
territories of the United States regardless of the number of hours included in such training and
shall have authority to require supplemental training as a condition of eligibility for licensure.
2. The director shall have the authority to limit any exception provided in subsection
1 of this section to persons remaining in the same commission or transferring to a commission
in a similar jurisdiction.
3. The basic training of every peace officer, except agents of the conservation
commission, shall include at least thirty hours of training in the investigation and
management of cases involving domestic and family violence. Such training shall include
instruction, specific to domestic and family violence cases, regarding: report writing;
physical abuse, sexual abuse, child fatalities and child neglect; interviewing children and
alleged perpetrators; the nature, extent and causes of domestic and family violence; the safety
of victims, other family and household members and investigating officers; legal rights and
remedies available to victims, including rights to compensation and the enforcement of civil
and criminal remedies; services available to victims and their children; the effects of cultural,
racial and gender bias in law enforcement; and state statutes. Said curriculum shall be
developed and presented in consultation with the department of health and senior services, the
children's division, public and private providers of programs for victims of domestic and
family violence, persons who have demonstrated expertise in training and education
concerning domestic and family violence, and the Missouri coalition against domestic
violence.
4. The basic training of every peace officer first licensed on or after August 28, 2027,
shall include at least six hours of training concerning the prohibition against racial profiling
and such training shall promote understanding and respect for racial and cultural differences
and the use of effective, noncombative methods for carrying out law enforcement duties in a
racially and culturally diverse environment. Such training shall include two hours of racial
profiling training, two hours of implicit bias training, and two hours of de-escalation training.
5. The basic training of every peace officer first licensed on or after August 28,
2026, shall include at least six hours of training concerning offenses classified as hate

HB 2519 4
offenses under section 557.055, which shall include specific instruction on hate offense
identification, de-escalation, and victim assistance.
590.050. 1. The POST commission shall establish requirements for the continuing
education of all peace officers. Peace officers who make traffic stops shall be required to
receive three hours of training within the law enforcement continuing education three-year
reporting period concerning the prohibition against racial profiling and such training shall
promote understanding and respect for racial and cultural differences and the use of effective,
noncombative methods for carrying out law enforcement duties in a racially and culturally
diverse environment. All peace officers shall be required to receive three hours of
training within the law enforcement continuing education three-year reporting period
concerning offenses classified as hate offenses under section 557.055, which shall include
specific instruction on hate offense identification, de-escalation, and victim assistance.
2. The director shall license continuing education providers and may probate, suspend
and revoke such licenses upon written notice stating the reasons for such action. Any person
aggrieved by a decision of the director pursuant to this subsection may appeal as provided in
chapter 536.
3. The costs of continuing law enforcement education shall be reimbursed in part by
moneys from the peace officer standards and training commission fund created in section
590.178, subject to availability of funds, except that no such funds shall be used for the
training of any person not actively commissioned or employed by a county or municipal law
enforcement agency.
4. The director may engage in any activity intended to further the professionalism of
peace officers through training and education, including the provision of specialized training
through the department of public safety.
650.910. 1. (1) There is hereby created in the state treasury the "Supplemental
Nonprofit Safety and Security Fund", which shall consist of moneys collected under this
section and section 650.900. The state treasurer shall be custodian of the fund. In accordance
with sections 30.170 and 30.180, the state treasurer may approve disbursements. The fund
shall be a dedicated fund and, upon appropriation, moneys in this fund shall be used solely as
provided in this section and section 650.900.
(2) Notwithstanding the provisions of section 33.080 to the contrary, any moneys
remaining in the fund at the end of the biennium shall not revert to the credit of the general
revenue fund.
(3) The state treasurer shall invest moneys in the fund in the same manner as other
funds are invested. Any interest and moneys earned on such investments shall be credited to
the fund.

HB 2519 5
2. The fund shall be used to defray the costs of security enhancements or measures for
eligible nonprofit organizations described in subsection 4 of this section, including:
(1) Safety and security planning, equipment, training, and exercises;
(2) Security-related technology including, but not limited to, security cameras,
reinforced doors, and alarm systems;
(3) Threat awareness and response training;
(4) Upgrades to existing structures that enhance safety and security;
(5) The hiring of trained security personnel for large gatherings or holidays; and
[(5)] (6) Vulnerability and threat assessments.
3. Nonprofit organizations whose applications for funding through the Federal
Emergency Management Agency's nonprofit security grant program have been approved by
the department of public safety office of homeland security are eligible for grants from the
fund. No additional application shall be required for grants from the fund and an application
for a grant from the federal program is also an application for funding from the fund.
4. An eligible organization may receive a grant from the fund of up to five percent of
the available grant pool for distribution. No grants under the fund shall be awarded until the
announcement of the recipients and the amount of the grants awarded under the federal
nonprofit security grant program.
5. No more than five percent of the available funds available annually shall be used
for administration expenses associated with the fund.
6. The director may promulgate all necessary rules and regulations for the
administration of this section. Any rule or portion of a rule, as that term is defined in section
536.010, that is created under the authority delegated in this section shall become effective
only if it complies with and is subject to all of the provisions of chapter 536 and, if applicable,
section 536.028. This section and chapter 536 are nonseverable and if any of the powers
vested with the general assembly pursuant to chapter 536 to review, to delay the effective
date, or to disapprove and annul a rule are subsequently held unconstitutional, then the grant
of rulemaking authority and any rule proposed or adopted after August 28, 2025, shall be
invalid and void.
650.2000. 1. For purposes of this section, the following terms mean:
(1) "Department", the department of public safety;
(2) "Hate crime", an offense established under section 557.055;
(3) "Hate crime hotline", or "hotline", the communications channel or channels
overseen by the department under this section;
(4) "Law enforcement agency", the same meaning as defined in section
590.1040;

HB 2519 6
(5) "Law enforcement officer", any public servant having both the power and
duty to make arrests for violations of the laws of this state and federal law enforcement
officers authorized to carry firearms and to make arrests for violations of the laws of the
United States;
(6) "Local service providers", providers of services to people who have been
targeted or affected by hate crimes including, but not limited to, crisis intervention,
advocacy, information and referral, and outreach and awareness, that are located in the
same geographic area where the hate crime incident occurred or where the targeted or
affected person resides;
(7) "Personal identifying information", any information that can be used to
distinguish or trace an individual's identity including, but not limited to, name, prior
legal name, alias, mother's maiden name, date or place of birth, residence, mailing
address, telephone number, email address, Social Security number, driver's license
number, bank account number, or other similar information.
2. The department shall oversee a toll-free hate crime hotline and online portal
staffed during business hours and dedicated to assisting people who have been targeted
or affected by hate crimes. The hotline shall:
(1) Provide appropriate information to people who have been targeted or
affected by hate crimes that is victim-centered, culturally competent, and trauma-
informed;
(2) Refer calls and reports received to local authorities when appropriate, within
forty-eight hours of receiving a call or report; and
(3) Be accessible to as many residents of the state, regardless of language
proficiency, as is practicably possible within the limits of the resources appropriated to
operate the hotline.
3. The department shall:
(1) To the extent practicable, identify local service providers and culturally
specific services to whom to refer people who have been targeted or affected by hate
crimes;
(2) Coordinate and partner with any other hotlines relevant to the hate crime
hotline; and
(3) Establish and appoint an advisory committee that shall include, but not be
limited to, representatives from legal aid, at least five community organizations that
work with historically underserved communities across the state, local and culturally
specific service providers, other state agencies, and any other entities the department
deems relevant to the program. The advisory committee shall provide advice and

HB 2519 7
assistance regarding program design, operation, outreach, service delivery objectives
and priorities, and funding.
4. Before July 1, 2027, the department shall develop and implement a pilot
hotline program in at least three counties to assist individuals targeted or affected by
hate crimes. No later than January 1, 2029, the department shall implement the
program statewide.
5. Before July 1, 2029, and at least annually thereafter, the department shall
provide information regarding hate crimes reported to the hotline during the prior
calendar year to the governor, senate, and house of representatives and make the
information publicly available on its website, excluding the personal identifying
information of any individual.
6. Any information regarding hate crimes or bias incidents that reveals the
personal identifying information of any individual shall not be included in any public
report prepared in accordance with this section and is confidential and exempt from
public inspection, copying, or disclosure under chapter 610.
7. Any law enforcement agency in this state that receives a report of a hate crime
shall provide the phone number and website address of the hotline to the targeted or
affected person.
8. Whenever a hate crime is reported to the hotline by a member of the public,
the hotline shall inquire whether the person reported the hate crime to law enforcement.
If the person targeted or affected by the hate crime consents to sharing personal
identifying information with the primary local law enforcement agency of the
jurisdiction in which the hate crime occurred, the hotline shall promptly share the
targeted or affected person's name, address, and contact information with the primary
local law enforcement agency. If the targeted or affected person consents to share some
but not all personal identifying information, the hotline shall share only the information
the targeted or affected person has consented to share.
9. The director of the department of public safety may promulgate all necessary
rules and regulations for the administration of this section. Any rule or portion of a
rule, as that term is defined in section 536.010, that is created under the authority
delegated in this section shall become effective only if it complies with and is subject to
all of the provisions of chapter 536 and, if applicable, section 536.028. This section and
chapter 536 are nonseverable and if any of the powers vested with the general assembly
pursuant to chapter 536 to review, to delay the effective date, or to disapprove and annul
a rule are subsequently held unconstitutional, then the grant of rulemaking authority
and any rule proposed or adopted after August 28, 2026, shall be invalid and void.

HB 2519 8
650.2005. 1. The state office of homeland security shall coordinate with federal
and local agencies to develop a program within the department of public safety to
monitor racially motivated violent extremism in the state. The program shall provide
resources for community-based, counter-radicalization programs that educate young
people on recognizing online hate recruitment techniques.
2. Before January 1, 2028, and each year thereafter, the state office of homeland
security shall issue an annual racially motivated violent extremism threat assessment
report that is specific to the state of Missouri. Such report shall be submitted to the
governor, senate, and house of representatives.
3. For purposes of this section, "racially motivated violent extremism" means a
situation in which a person threatens the use of force or uses force or violence in
violation of a state or federal law in furtherance of political or social agendas motivated
by a hate bias related to race, color, or national origin.
660.840. 1. There is hereby created in the state treasury the "Missouri Hate
Crime Victim Assistance Fund", which shall be administered by the department of
social services. The fund shall consist of gifts, donations, grants, and bequests from
individuals, private organizations, foundations, or other sources. The state treasurer
shall be custodian of the fund. In accordance with sections 30.170 and 30.180, the state
treasurer may approve disbursements. The fund shall be a dedicated fund and, upon
appropriation, moneys in this fund shall be used to provide mental health counseling,
relocation support, and legal aid for victims and families affected by any offense
classified as a hate offense under section 557.055.
2. Notwithstanding the provisions of section 33.080 to the contrary, any moneys
remaining in the fund at the end of the biennium shall not revert to the credit of the
general revenue fund.
3. The state treasurer shall invest moneys in the fund in the same manner as
other funds are invested. Any interest and moneys earned on such investments shall be
credited to the fund.
✔